Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-506
Board, defined.

Wherever the word board is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573, and not otherwise specified, it shall be taken to mean the board of directors of the district organized under the provisions of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(4), p. 525.